California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) For each county, the amount determined in paragraph (3) shall be subtracted from the amount determined in paragraph (1). If the resulting amount is negative, no
 funds shall be allocated to that county. If the resulting amount is positive, that amount shall be the county’s maximum allocation and shall be made available to that county in the same manner and according to the same procedures and requirements that govern funds made available pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 16703, except that the department shall make the payment of each county’s allocation as determined above in one lump sum on or before January 1, 1990. 

(5) For purposes of computing fiscal year 1989–90 reimbursements under this section, if the sum of funding that a county received from its allocation pursuant to Section 16703, the amount of reimbursement it received from federal State Legalization Impact Assistance Grant funding for indigent care, and its share of funding provided in this section is less than the amount of funding the county received pursuant to Section 16703 in fiscal year 1988–89 the state shall reimburse the
 county for the amount of the difference. For purposes of computing reimbursements under this section, if the sum of funding that a county received from its fiscal year 1990–91 allocation pursuant to Section 16703, and the amount received from State Legalization Impact Assistance Grant funds, plus the amount of the reductions made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Chapter 1323 of the Statutes of 1990 and Chapter 467 of the Statutes of 1990, is less than the amount of funding a county received pursuant to Section 16703 in the 1988–89 fiscal year, the state shall reimburse the difference. If the department determines that the county has not made reasonable efforts to document and claim federal SLIAG funding for indigent care, the department shall deny the reimbursement. 

(6) The calculations specified in paragraph (5) shall be performed after the end of the fiscal year after all claims from a county for that fiscal year have been
 adjudicated. For fiscal year 1989–90, claims for funding pursuant to this section shall be submitted no later than April 30, 1992, and, if approved by the department, shall be reimbursed no later than June 30, 1992. For fiscal year 1990–91, claims for funding pursuant to this section shall be submitted no later than April 30, 1993, and, if approved by the department, shall be reimbursed no later than June 30, 1993. 

(7) If a county submits additional claims for services provided in a specific year and has received funds under paragraph (5) for that year, the department shall reimburse the General Fund up to amount received under paragraph (5) from federal State Legalization Impact Assistance Grant funds otherwise payable to the county based upon the additional claims. 

(b) In determining if a county has made reasonable efforts to document and claim federal State Legalization
 Impact Assistance Grant funding, the department may require a county to utilize statistically valid sampling methods or to utilize the federal Cost Documentation System for Social Security matching. 

(c) To the extent allowed by federal law, the department shall make quarterly prospective payments of federal State Legalization Impact Assistance Grant funds to counties for the 1988–89, 1989–90, and 1990–91 fiscal years SLIAG claims for indigent health services. Prospective payments shall not exceed the total amount of a county’s 1987–88 fiscal year claim, as adjusted by the department, on an annualized basis. As a condition of receiving a prospective payment, the county shall certify that it intends to submit claims exceeding the amount of the payments. A county shall be liable for any overpayments or federal sanctions in the event of an excess drawdown of federal State Legalization Impact Assistance Grant funds. 

(d) A county may apply for, and the Department of Finance may approve, a state General Fund loan in the 1989–90 fiscal year to meet anticipated shortfalls in its Medically Indigent Services Program. In order to receive funds, the county shall demonstrate to the Department of Finance that the county will not submit 1989–90 fiscal year claims totaling more than 50 percent of its estimated SLIAG amount as determined by its percentage of the newly legalized population multiplied by the amount of total SLIAG funds available. The county shall also demonstrate that the county has made reasonable efforts to document and claim federal SLIAG funds as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a). In no event shall the loan amount exceed 50 percent of a county’s percentage of the newly legalized population multiplied by the amount of total SLIAG funds available, or exceed the amount to which the county is entitled pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).
 The loan shall be issued to the county, as soon as possible after the enactment of Assembly Bill 1154 of the 1989–90 Regular Session of the Legislature, but no later than June 30, 1990. The loan balance shall be credited in the amount of funds provided pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) upon receipt of the funds. Repayment shall include interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 511, Sec. 1.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Capital Outlay [16994. - 16994.]

16994.

(a) (1) Ninety percent of the amount appropriated for the purposes of this article shall be allocated to MISP counties according to the percentages specified in this chapter.

(2) The remaining 10 percent shall be allocated to CMSP counties, according to the following procedures:

(A) Calculate the sum of uncompensated care costs for all hospitals in each CMSP county.

(B) Divide the sum of subparagraph (A) by the sum of uncompensated care costs for all hospitals within all CMSP counties.

(C) Multiply the quotient derived from the application of subparagraph (B) by the total amount appropriated pursuant to paragraph (2) for the purposes of this article.

(b) Funding utilized under this section shall be for capital expenditure and equipment acquisition purposes associated with the direct delivery of patient care. In addition, each county may utilize up to two million dollars ($2,000,000) or 25 percent of its allocation under this section, whichever is greater, on a one-time basis only in the 1989–90 fiscal year to restore county special fund balances to their July 1, 1988, levels. Funds from this section may be allocated for this purpose only in circumstances where the county board of
 supervisors transferred moneys from those special funds to the county general fund or from the county general fund to health facilities enterprise funds in order to support indigent health care services in the 1988–89 fiscal year. All capital outlay moneys under this section utilized to restore county special fund or general fund balances shall be appropriated for capital expenditures and equipment acquisition associated with the direct delivery of patient care in the 1990–91 fiscal year.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no less than 67 percent of the moneys a county receives under this section shall be allocated to county acute care hospitals, University of California hospitals, or any private hospital licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, which operates an emergency room or a burn unit or outpatient clinic. The moneys may be expended for facility repair, renovation, remodeling,
 expansion, or acquisition or equipment needs.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (b), up to 33 percent of the moneys a county receives under this section may be expended for capital improvement and equipment needs for outpatient clinics, or mental health facilities, or public health clinics or licensed community and free clinics or clinics operated by tribes or tribal organizations.

(e) Noncounty hospitals shall utilize funds received under this section only for capital expenditures related to emergency room, burn unit, and outpatient clinics.

(f) County hospitals may utilize funds received under this section for expenditures related to inpatient, outpatient, emergency room, or burn unit services. 

(g) Funds utilized from this section shall be for
 capital expenditure purposes associated with the direct treatment of patients.

(h) Each county receiving moneys under this section shall submit a plan for the use of these moneys to the department for review and approval prior to making any commitment for the expenditure of such funds. Any subsequent revision to the county’s capital improvements plan shall also be submitted for review and approval. The department’s approval authority shall be limited to a determination of whether the county’s plan conforms to statutory provisions as contained in this section and part. The department may establish necessary procedures and forms for the submission, review, and approval of county plans and reports.

(i) (1) Counties receiving moneys pursuant to this section shall deposit them in a separate capital outlay fund, established solely for this purpose, before
 transferring or expending them.

(2) Interest earnings on the fund established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall accrue to the benefit of that capital outlay fund, and shall be expended for uses authorized by this section.

(3) County costs of administering the fund established pursuant to this section shall be reimbursed from that fund.

(j) The expenditure of moneys authorized by this section may be made without regard to fiscal year provided that moneys authorized by this section shall be available for encumbrance for three fiscal years and for expenditure for five fiscal years, including the 1989–90 fiscal year. At the end of five years any moneys which have not been expended shall be recouped by the department.

(k) Counties shall submit an annual
 report, in accordance with guidelines provided by the department, detailing the use and actual expenditure of moneys received pursuant to this section. The department shall recoup the amount of any county expenditure which does not conform to the provisions of this section.

(l) Payment of moneys under this section shall be made as follows:

(1) Half of the county’s allocation shall be paid upon the department’s approval of the county plan specified in subdivision (h).

(2) The remaining half of the county’s allocation shall be paid upon execution of a capital outlay standard agreement, between the county board of supervisors and the department.

(m) For the purposes of this section, “capital expenditures” means expenditures for fixed assets, major
 movable equipment, fixtures, structures, emergency communications systems necessary to perform the duties of a base station hospital or base hospital physician, as defined in Sections 1797.58 and 1797.59 of the Health and Safety Code, and improvements as defined for counties in “Accounting Standards and Procedures for Counties” issued by the Office of the Controller, Division of Local Government, Fiscal Affairs and for other providers as defined by generally accepted standards of accounting practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 49.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Eligibility and Benefit Requirements [16995. - 16995.1.]

16995.

Funds received by a county pursuant to this chapter shall not be used to support health services provided to persons detained in a county or city jail or other correctional facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 719, Sec. 11.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

16995.1.

Receipt of funding pursuant to this chapter shall not relieve a county of its obligation to provide indigent health care as required by Section 17000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Children’s Hospitals [16996. - 16996.2.]

16996.

For purposes of this chapter, “children’s hospital” means the following facilities:

(a) Valley Children’s Hospital, Fresno.

(b) Earl and Loraine Miller Children’s Hospital and Medical Center of the Memorial Hospital of Long Beach, Long Beach.

(c) Children’s Hospital of Los Angeles, Los Angeles.

(d) Children’s Hospital Medical Center of Northern California, Oakland.

(e) Children’s Hospital of Orange County, Orange.

(f) Lucile Salter Packard Children’s Hospital at Stanford, Palo Alto.

(g) Children’s Hospital and Health Center, San Diego.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16996.1.

Funds appropriated to the department for the purposes of this chapter shall be distributed as follows:

(a) The department shall compute the annual amount of financial assistance available to each eligible children’s hospital based upon the ratio of each hospital’s uncompensated care costs to the total uncompensated care costs of all children’s hospitals in the state.

(b) The department shall enter into a contract with each children’s hospital receiving funding pursuant to this section and may make quarterly payments provided that the hospital has complied with subdivision (a) of Section 16996.2.

(c) Each children’s hospital shall, as a condition of receiving financial assistance under this section, submit reports to the department, as required by the department, describing its use of funds received pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 50, Sec. 29.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16996.2.

(a) As a condition of receiving funds under Section 16996.1, a hospital shall provide medically necessary inpatient treatment, including prescription drugs, for any condition detected as part of a child health and disability prevention screen for any child eligible for services under Section 104395 of the Health and Safety Code. Inpatient hospital services shall be provided at no cost upon referral by a child health and disability prevention program provider, whether that provider is a physician, a county, or a primary care clinic, unless the child is eligible to receive care with no share of cost under the Medi-Cal program, is covered under another publicly funded program, or the services are payable under private insurance coverage.

(b) The department shall report to the Legislature on the distribution and use of funds provided to hospitals under Section 16996.1 on an annual basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 498.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. COUNTY AID AND RELIEF TO INDIGENTS [17000. - 17613.4.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [17000. - 17030.1.]

17000.

Every county and every city and county shall relieve and support all incompetent, poor, indigent persons, and those incapacitated by age, disease, or accident, lawfully resident therein, when such persons are not supported and relieved by their relatives or friends, by their own means, or by state hospitals or other state or private institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

17000.5.

(a) The board of supervisors in any county may adopt a general assistance standard of aid, including the value of in-kind aid which includes, but is not limited to, the monthly actuarial value of up to forty dollars ($40) per month of medical care, that is 62 percent of a guideline that is equal to the 1991 federal official poverty line and may annually adjust that guideline in an amount equal to any adjustment provided under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 for establishing a maximum aid level in the county. This subdivision is not intended to either limit or expand the extent of the duty of counties to provide health care.

(b) The adoption of a standard of aid pursuant to this section shall constitute a sufficient standard of aid.

(c) For purposes of this section, “federal official poverty line” means the same as it is defined in subsection (2) of Section 9902 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “any adjustment” includes, and, prior to the addition of this subdivision, included statutory increases, decreases, or reductions in the maximum aid level in the county under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.

(e) In the event that adjustments pursuant to Section 11450.02 are not made, the amounts established pursuant to subdivision (a) may be adjusted to reflect the relative cost of housing in various counties as follows:

(1) Reduced by 1.5 percent in the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Los Angeles, San Diego, Santa Barbara, Sonoma, and Ventura.

(2) Reduced by 3 percent in the Counties of San Luis Obispo, Nevada, Sierra, Monterey, Napa, Solano, Riverside, San Bernardino, Alpine, Amador, Calaveras, Inyo, Kern, Mariposa, Mono, and Tuolumne.

(3) Reduced by 4.5 percent in the Counties of Stanislaus, Imperial, El Dorado, Placer, Sacramento, Yolo, Humboldt, San Benito, Del Norte, Fresno, Lake, Mendocino, Shasta, Trinity, Butte, Merced, Tulare, San Joaquin, Lassen, Modoc, Plumas, Siskiyou, Tehama, Kings, Madera, Colusa, Glenn, Sutter, and Yuba.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 6, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17000.51.

(a) Notwithstanding the decision in Caulk v. Superior Court, CO15355, June 27, 1997, a county’s discretion granted pursuant to Section 17000.5 to include, as part of a general assistance aid grant, in-kind aid with a monthly actuarial value of up to forty dollars ($40) per month of medical care, was not intended, and shall not be construed, to do any of the following:

(1) Satisfy, in whole or in part, the duty of a county or a city or county to provide health care services to indigent and dependent poor persons under Section 17000.

(2) Permit a county or a city and county to cease providing health care services under Section 17000.

(3) Affect the eligibility of indigent and dependent poor persons for health care services under Section 17000.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall cease to be implemented if, and only to the extent that, a final court decision holds that subdivision (a) imposes a state-mandated local program.

(c) Subdivision (a) confirms, and is declarative of, rather than a change in, existing law, as provided for in Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 1996, which was intended only to provide a county or city and county with the discretion to reduce its general assistance grant level by up to forty dollars ($40) per month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 84.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17000.6.

(a) The board of supervisors of any county may adopt a standard of aid below the level established in Section 17000.5 if the Commission on State Mandates makes a finding that meeting the standards in Section 17000.5 would result in a significant financial distress to the county. When the commission makes a finding of significant financial distress concerning a county, the board of supervisors may establish a level of aid which is not less than 40 percent of the 1991 federal official poverty level, which may be further reduced pursuant to Section 17001.5 for shared housing. The commission shall not make a finding of significant financial distress unless the county has made a compelling case that, absent the finding, basic county services, including public safety, cannot be maintained.

(b) Upon receipt of a written application from a county board of supervisors, the commission may make a finding of financial distress for a period of up to 36 months pursuant to regulations that are necessary to implement this section, which shall be adopted by the commission. The period of reduction may be renewed by the commission upon reapplication by the county. Any county that filed an application or reapplication that was approved for a period of up to 12 months by the commission on or before December 31, 1996, shall be deemed to have had that application or reapplication approved for a period of 36 months. If the period of financial distress is delayed by court action, the period shall be tolled during that delay.

(c) As part of the decisionmaking process, the commission shall notice and hold a public hearing on the county’s application or reapplication in the county of application. The commission shall provide a 30-day notice of the hearing in the county of application or reapplication. The commission shall notify the applicant county of its preliminary decision within 60 days after receiving the application and final decision within 90 days after receiving the application. If a county files an application while another county’s application is pending, the commission may extend both the preliminary decision period up to 120 days and the final decision period up to 150 days from the date of the application and any current period of significant financial distress of the applicant county that has been set pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be extended for the same period.

(d) This section shall not be construed to eliminate the requirement that a county provide aid pursuant to Section 17000.

(e) Any standard of aid adopted pursuant to this section shall constitute a sufficient standard of aid.

(f) A county board of supervisors may continue the standard of aid adopted under this section beyond the period in subdivision (b), irrespective of whether the county has applied for or received a renewal of the authority to reduce aid as permitted by subdivision (b), provided the county acts in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The county may not prohibit an employable individual from receiving aid under this part for less than six months in a 12-month period, whether or not the months are consecutive. If an employable individual has taken and continues to take all steps to apply for appropriate positions and has not refused an offer of employment without good cause, a county shall extend aid until the individual has received aid for nine months in a 12-month period. The time limit provided in this paragraph shall begin for each employable individual at the time the employable individual is enrolled in the mandatory welfare-to-work program set forth in paragraph (2).

(2) The county shall, within six months of the county’s implementation of this subdivision, require employable individuals to participate while on aid under this part in services equivalent to the welfare-to-work program provided for pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3. Employable individuals shall participate in this program as a condition of eligibility for aid under this part.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to give preference to recipients of benefits under this part for welfare-to-work services under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3.

(g) The commission may adopt emergency regulations for the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 30.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.

The board of supervisors of each county, or the agency authorized by county charter, shall adopt standards of aid and care for the indigent and dependent poor of the county or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, Section 17000.5, the board of supervisors of each county, or the agency authorized by the county charter, may do any of the following:

(1) (A) Adopt residency requirements for purposes of determining a persons’ eligibility for general assistance. Any residence requirement under this paragraph shall not exceed 15 days.

(B) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize the adoption of a requirement that an applicant or recipient have an address or to require a homeless person to acquire an address.

(2) (A) Establish a standard of general assistance for applicants and recipients who share housing with one or more unrelated persons or with one or more persons who are not legally responsible for the applicant or recipient. The standard of general assistance aid established pursuant to Section 17000.5 for a single adult applicant or recipient may be reduced pursuant to this paragraph by not more than the following percentages, as appropriate:

(i) Fifteen percent if the applicant or recipient shares housing with one other person described in this subparagraph.

(ii) Twenty percent if the applicant or recipient shares housing with two other persons described in this subparagraph.

(iii) Twenty-five percent if the applicant or recipient shares housing with three or more other persons described in this paragraph.

(B) Any standard of aid adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall constitute a sufficient standard of aid for any recipient who shares housing.

(C) Counties with shared housing reductions larger than the amounts specified in subparagraph (A) as of August 19, 1992, may continue to apply those adjustments.

(3) Discontinue aid under this part for a period of not more than 180 days with respect to any recipient who is employable and has received aid under this part for three months if the recipient engages in any of the following conduct:

(A) Fails, or refuses, without good cause, to participate in a qualified job training program, participation of which is a condition of receipt of assistance.

(B) After completion of a job training program, fails, or refuses, without good cause, to accept an offer of appropriate employment.

(C) Persistently fails, or refuses, without good cause, to cooperate with the county in its efforts to do any of the following:

(i) Enroll the recipient in a job training program.

(ii) After completion of a job training program, locate and secure appropriate employment for the recipient.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, lack of good cause may be demonstrated by a showing of any of the following:

(i) The willful failure, or refusal, of the recipient to participate in a job training program, accept appropriate employment, or cooperate in enrolling in a training program or locating employment.

(ii) Not less than three separate acts of negligent failure of the recipient to engage in any of the activities described in clause (i).

(4) Prohibit an employable individual from receiving aid under this part for more than three months in any 12-month period, whether or not the months are consecutive. This paragraph shall apply to aid received on or after the effective date of this paragraph. This paragraph shall apply only to those individuals who have been offered an opportunity to attend job skills or job training sessions.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), discontinue aid to, or sanction, recipients for failure or refusal without good cause to follow program requirements. For purposes of this subdivision, lack of good cause may be demonstrated by a showing of either (A) willful failure or refusal of the recipient to follow program requirements, or (B) not less than three separate acts of negligent failure of the recipient to follow program requirements.

(b) (1) The Legislative Analyst shall conduct an evaluation of the impact of this section on general assistance recipients and applicants.

(2) The evaluation required by paragraph (1) shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The impact on the extent of homelessness among applicants and recipients of general assistance.

(B) The rate at which recipients of general assistance are sanctioned by county welfare departments.

(C) The impact of the 15-day residency requirement on applicants or recipients of general assistance, including how often the requirement is invoked.

(3) The Legislative Analyst shall, in the conduct of the study required by this section, consult with the State Department of Social Services, the County Welfare Directors Association, and organizations that advocate on behalf of recipients of general assistance.

(c) A county may provide aid pursuant to Section 17000.5 either by cash assistance, in-kind aid, a two-party payment, voucher payment, or check drawn to the order of a third-party provider of services to the recipient. Nothing shall restrict a county from providing more than one method of aid to an individual recipient.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 6, Sec. 9) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 206, Sec. 34.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.51.

(a) A county may require adult applicants and recipients of benefits under the general assistance program to undergo screening for substance abuse when it is determined by the county that there is reasonable suspicion to believe that an individual is dependent upon illegal drugs or alcohol. The county shall maintain documentation of this finding.

(b) A county may require as a condition of aid reasonable participation in substance abuse or alcohol treatment programs for persons screened pursuant to subdivision (a) and professionally evaluated to be in need of treatment, if the services are actually available at no charge to the applicant or recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 6, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.6.

(a) To the extent not inconsistent with federal law, a county may require the legal sponsor of a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States general assistance recipient to sign a written agreement to repay any aid provided to the person during the period of time during which the sponsor has agreed, in writing, to provide for the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States.

(b) Upon request of the board of supervisors, the district attorney or any other civil legal officer may maintain an action against the legal sponsor of a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States to recover, for the county,
 the aid provided the person during the period described in subdivision (a) and to secure an order requiring payment of any sums that may become due in the future.

(c) For purposes of enforcing this section, a county may seek and employ all remedies otherwise authorized by this part.

(d) This section shall not be construed to authorize a county to penalize a recipient of general assistance, or to otherwise deny, curtail, or modify the general assistance provided a recipient unless otherwise provided in the county general assistance program standards and requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 79.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.7.

(a) In adopting standards of aid and care for the indigent and dependent poor of the county or city and county, the board of supervisors or the agency authorized by the county charter may, for purposes of determining eligibility for aid and care, deem the income and resources of any person who, as a sponsor of the entry of a general assistance applicant or recipient into the United States, executed an affidavit of support or similar agreement with respect to that applicant or recipient, and the income and resources of the sponsor’s spouse, to be the income and resources of that applicant or recipient, in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c), for a period of three years after the individual’s entry into the United
 States. Any such deemed income shall be treated as unearned income of the general assistance applicant or recipient.

(b) (1) The amount of income of a sponsor and the sponsor’s spouse that shall be deemed to be the unearned income of a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States for any month shall be determined as follows:

(A) The total amount of earned and unearned income of the sponsor and the sponsor’s spouse, if the spouse is living with the sponsor, shall be determined for that month.

(B) The amount determined under subparagraph (A) shall be reduced by an amount equal to the following:

(i) One hundred seventy-five dollars
 ($175), or 20 percent of the total of any amounts received by the sponsor and the sponsor’s spouse in that month as wages or salary or as net earnings from self-employment, plus the full amount of any costs incurred by them in producing self-employment income in that month, whichever is less.

(ii) The amount of maximum aid established pursuant to Section 11450 for a family of the same size and composition as the sponsor and those other individuals living in the same household as the sponsor who are claimed by the sponsor as dependents for purposes of determining the sponsor’s federal personal income tax liability, but whose needs are not taken into account in making a determination for eligibility for Aid to Families with Dependent Children program under Section 602(a)(7) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(iii) Any amounts paid by the sponsor or the sponsor’s spouse to individuals not living in the sponsor’s household who are claimed by the sponsor as dependents for purposes of determining the sponsor’s federal personal income tax liability.

(iv) Any payments of spousal or child support by the sponsor or the sponsor’s spouse with respect to individuals not living in the sponsor’s household.

(2) The amount of resources of a sponsor and the sponsor’s spouse that shall be deemed to be the resources of a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States for any month shall be the total amount of resources determined as if the sponsor were applying for general assistance under this chapter of the sponsor and the
 sponsor’s spouse, if the spouse is living with the sponsor, and in accordance with the standards adopted by the county or city and county, reduced by one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(c) Any sponsor of a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States, and the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States, shall be jointly and severally liable for an amount equal to any overpayment of aid made to the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States during the period of three years after the person’s entry into the United States, on account of the sponsor’s failure to provide correct information under this section, except where that sponsor was without fault, or where good cause of that failure existed.

(d) In any case where a person is
 the sponsor of two or more persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States who are living in the same home, the income and resources of the sponsor and the sponsor’s spouse, to the extent they would be deemed the income and resources of any one of these persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States under subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, shall be divided into two or more equal shares, the number of shares being the same as the number of these persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States, and the income and resources of each of those persons shall be deemed to include one share.

(e) As a condition to providing aid pursuant to this chapter, the county or city and county may require the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States to provide the name and address of
 the person’s sponsor and may require the person or the person’s sponsor to provide all information regarding the income and assets of the sponsor and the sponsor’s spouse necessary to enforce this section.

(f) The deeming of sponsor’s and sponsor’s spouse’s income and resources shall not apply to a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States whose sponsor has abandoned their duty to support the person. For purposes of this section, abandonment of the duty to support shall include, but not be limited to, abuse, battery, neglect, or refusal to support. Evidence of abandonment may be demonstrated by documentary evidence or collateral statements.

(g) This section shall not apply to a person who is not a citizen or national of the United States to whom any of the
 following applies:

(1) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, prior to April 1, 1980, of Section 1153(a)(7) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, after March 31, 1980, of Section 1157(c) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(3) Paroled into the United States as a refugee under Section 1182(d)(5) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(4) Granted political asylum by the Attorney General of the United States pursuant to Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(5) A Cuban or Haitian entrant,
 as defined in Section 501(e) of the Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-422).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 80.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17001.8.

(a) In adopting standards of aid for general assistance for the indigent and dependent poor of the county or city and county, the board of supervisors or the agency authorized by the county charter may determine, with regard to any person who is not a citizen or national of the United States whose entry into the United States has been sponsored by an individual who, or an organization which, executed an affidavit of support or similar agreement with respect to the person and who has become ineligible for assistance pursuant to Section 11008.135, that the person who is not a citizen or national of the United States is ineligible for aid for a period of five years after the person’s entry into the United
 States, unless (1) the person is a minor and the sponsor, or the sponsor’s spouse, is the parent of the person’s child or (2) the sponsoring person dies or the sponsoring organization ceases to exist.

(b) This section shall not apply with respect to any person who is not a citizen or a national of the United States who is:

(1) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, prior to April 1, 1980, of the provisions of Section 1153 (c) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) Admitted to the United States as a result of the application, after March 31, 1980, of Section 1157(c) of Title 8 of the
 United States Code.

(3) Paroled into the United States under Section 1182(d)(5) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(4) Granted political asylum by the United States Attorney General under Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(5) A Cuban or Haitian entrant, as defined in Section 501(e) of the Refugee Education Assistance Act of 1980 (Public Law 96-422).

(c) This section shall become operative on the effective date of federal law that prohibits providing assistance to sponsored persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States and shall remain operative only as long as that federal law remains in effect. The
 Director of Social Services shall determine the operative dates of this section pursuant to this subdivision and shall execute a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, that sets forth the operative date or termination date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 81.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Section operative on date prescribed by its own provisions.    Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

17001.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part:
